Utah statutes.
77-27-8.   Record of hearing.

(1)  A verbatim record of proceedings before the Board of Pardons and Parole shall be maintained by a suitable electronic recording device, except when the board dispenses with a record in a particular hearing or a portion of the proceedings.

(2)  When the hearing involves the commutation of a death sentence, a certified shorthand reporter, in addition to electronic means, shall record all proceedings except when the board dispenses with a record for the purpose of deliberations in executive session.  The compensation of the reporter shall be determined by the board.  The reporter shall immediately file with the board the original record and when requested shall with reasonable diligence furnish a transcription or copy of the record upon payment of reasonable fees as determined by the board.

(3)  When an inmate or offender affirms by affidavit that he is unable to pay for a copy of the record, the board may furnish a copy of the record, at the expense of the state, to the inmate or offender.



Amended by Chapter 110, 2010 General Session

